klpt/data/ckb-Arab.aff
SFX T 0 یشیانمە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشیتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشیتە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشمیتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشمیتە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشیتییەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشیتییە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشمانیتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشمانیتە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشیانیتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشیانیتە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشتە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشییەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشییە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشمانەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشمانە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشتانەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشتانە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشیانەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشیانە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشینەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشینە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشتینەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشتینە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشینییەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشینییە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشتانینەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشتانینە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشیانینەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشیانینە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشنەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشنە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشمنەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشمنە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشنییەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشنییە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشماننەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشماننە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشیاننەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشیاننە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشتنەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشتنە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشتاننەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یشتاننە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 شم [ای]
SFX T 0 شتم [ای]
SFX T 0 شمی [ای]
SFX T 0 شتانم [ای]
SFX T 0 شیانم [ای]
SFX T 0 شیت [ای]
SFX T 0 شمیت [ای]
SFX T 0 شیتی [ای]
SFX T 0 شمانیت [ای]
SFX T 0 شیانیت [ای]
SFX T 0 ش [ای]
SFX T 0 شت [ای]
SFX T 0 شی [ای]
SFX T 0 شمان [ای]
SFX T 0 شتان [ای]
SFX T 0 شیان [ای]
SFX T 0 شین [ای]
SFX T 0 شتین [ای]
SFX T 0 شینی [ای]
SFX T 0 شتانین [ای]
SFX T 0 شیانین [ای]
SFX T 0 شن [ای]
SFX T 0 شمن [ای]
SFX T 0 شنی [ای]
SFX T 0 شمانن [ای]
SFX T 0 شیانن [ای]
SFX T 0 شتن [ای]
SFX T 0 شتانن [ای]
SFX T 0 شمەوە [ای]
SFX T 0 شمە [ای]
SFX T 0 شتمەوە [ای]
SFX T 0 شتمە [ای]
SFX T 0 شمییەوە [ای]
SFX T 0 شمییە [ای]
SFX T 0 شتانمەوە [ای]
SFX T 0 شتانمە [ای]
SFX T 0 شیانمەوە [ای]
SFX T 0 شیانمە [ای]
SFX T 0 شیتەوە [ای]
SFX T 0 شیتە [ای]
SFX T 0 شمیتەوە [ای]
SFX T 0 شمیتە [ای]
SFX T 0 شیتییەوە [ای]
SFX T 0 شیتییە [ای]
SFX T 0 شمانیتەوە [ای]
SFX T 0 شمانیتە [ای]
SFX T 0 شیانیتەوە [ای]
SFX T 0 شیانیتە [ای]
SFX T 0 شەوە [ای]
SFX T 0 شە [ای]
SFX T 0 شتەوە [ای]
SFX T 0 شتە [ای]
SFX T 0 شییەوە [ای]
SFX T 0 شییە [ای]
SFX T 0 شمانەوە [ای]
SFX T 0 شمانە [ای]
SFX T 0 شتانەوە [ای]
SFX T 0 شتانە [ای]
SFX T 0 شیانەوە [ای]
SFX T 0 شیانە [ای]
SFX T 0 شینەوە [ای]
SFX T 0 شینە [ای]
SFX T 0 شتینەوە [ای]
SFX T 0 شتینە [ای]
SFX T 0 شینییەوە [ای]
SFX T 0 شینییە [ای]
SFX T 0 شتانینەوە [ای]
SFX T 0 شتانینە [ای]
SFX T 0 شیانینەوە [ای]
SFX T 0 شیانینە [ای]
SFX T 0 شنەوە [ای]
SFX T 0 شنە [ای]
SFX T 0 شمنەوە [ای]
SFX T 0 شمنە [ای]
SFX T 0 شنییەوە [ای]
SFX T 0 شنییە [ای]
SFX T 0 شماننەوە [ای]
SFX T 0 شماننە [ای]
SFX T 0 شیاننەوە [ای]
SFX T 0 شیاننە [ای]
SFX T 0 شتنەوە [ای]
SFX T 0 شتنە [ای]
SFX T 0 شتاننەوە [ای]
SFX T 0 شتاننە [ای]
SFX T 0 مایە .
SFX T 0 مانیتەوە .
SFX T 0 مانیتە .
SFX T 0 مانە .
SFX T 0 ماننە .
SFX T 0 مایەتەوە .
SFX T 0 مایەتە .
SFX T 0 ە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یتایە .
SFX T 0 ینایە .
SFX T 0 نایە .
SFX T 0 مە .
SFX T 0 یتە .
SFX T 0 نییە .
SFX T 0 نە .
SFX T 0 نایەتەوە .
SFX T 0 نایەتە .
SFX T 0 مییە .
SFX T 0 میتە .
SFX T 0 منە .
SFX T 0 تمە .
SFX T 0 تانمە .
SFX T 0 تە .
SFX T 0 تانە .
SFX T 0 تینە .
SFX T 0 تانینە .
SFX T 0 تنە .
SFX T 0 تاننە .
SFX T 0 ەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 ایەتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 ایەتە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 یەتەوە [ا]
SFX T 0 یەتە [ا]
SFX T 0 ینە .
SFX T 0 یانمە .
SFX T 0 یتییە .
SFX T 0 یانیتە .
SFX T 0 ییە .
SFX T 0 یانە .
SFX T 0 ینییە .
SFX T 0 یانینە .
SFX T 0 یاننە .
SFX T 0 یتایەتەوە .
SFX T 0 یتایەتە .
SFX T 0 ینایەتەوە .
SFX T 0 ینایەتە .
SFX T 0 ویشتەتە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویتەتە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشیانیتەتەوە [ا]
SFX T 0 یشیتییە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشتاننەتە [ا]
SFX T 0 وینەتە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشیانەتە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشمانیتەتە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشەتە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویتەتەوە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشینەتە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشتن [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشیاننەتەوە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشمنەتە [ا]
SFX T 0 یشمی [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشتمەتە [ا]
SFX T 0 یشنی [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشمیتەتەوە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشتنەتە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشتانینەتە [ا]
SFX T 0 یشییەوە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشمەتە [ا]
SFX T 0 یشمییە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشتانمەتە [ا]
SFX T 0 یشییە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشمەتەوە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشمن [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشتنەتەوە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشیانیتەتە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشمانن [ا]
SFX T 0 یشی [ا]
SFX T 0 یشینییە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشتمەتەوە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشتم [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشمە [ا]
SFX T 0 وەتە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشتانە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشتەتەوە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشمانەتەوە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشتانەتە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشتینەتە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشیانە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشیانن [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشتانینەتەوە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشیانەتەوە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشیانمەتەوە [ا]
SFX T 0 ونەتە [ا]
SFX T 0 یشنییە [ا]
SFX T 0 یشیتی [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشتین [ا]
SFX T 0 یشینییەوە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشینەتەوە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشیاننەتە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشمیتەتە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشماننەتەوە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشتاننەتەوە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشماننەتە [ا]
SFX T 0 یشینی [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشنەتەوە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشیانینەتەوە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشیانمەتە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشیتەتە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشین [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشمیت [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشتانم [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشیانینەتە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشتانن [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشتینەتەوە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشمانیتەتەوە [ا]
SFX T 0 یشمییەوە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشتانین [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشیانم [ا]
SFX T 0 ومەتە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشم [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشیتەتەوە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشن [ا]
SFX T 0 یشنییەوە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشیانیت [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشیانین [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشمنەتەوە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشیت [ا]
SFX T 0 یشیتییەوە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشنەتە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشتانمەتەوە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشمانەتە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشمانە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشتە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشتانەتەوە [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشمانیت [ا]
SFX T 0 ویشەتەوە [ا]
SFX T 0 بنەوە .
SFX T 0 تەتەوە [یا]
SFX T 0 ویتەتەوە [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشیانن [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشتانە [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشتین [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشیانین [ی$]
SFX T 0 ایەتەوە [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشتمەتەوە [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشیاننەتەوە [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشمن [ی$]
SFX T 0 یشنییەوە [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشتاننەتەوە [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشمە [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشتانینەتەوە [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشتن [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشیانەتەوە [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشمانیتەتەوە [ی$]
SFX T 0 یشنی [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشیانیت [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشماننەتەوە [ی$]
SFX T 0 یشی [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشمانیت [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشتەتەوە [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشیانە [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشیانینەتەوە [ی$]
SFX T 0 یشمییەوە [ی$]
SFX T 0 یشینی [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشتانین [ی$]
SFX T 0 یشمی [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشمانن [ی$]
SFX T 0 یشییەوە [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشیانیتەتەوە [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشمیتەتەوە [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشتانن [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشمانە [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشتە [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشتنەتەوە [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشیانم [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشیانمەتەوە [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشتانەتەوە [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشتم [ی$]
SFX T 0 یشینییەوە [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشمانەتەوە [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشمنەتەوە [ی$]
SFX T 0 ویشمیت [ی$]

#######################################################################
# END OF MORPHOLOGICAL RULES FOR NOUNS, VERBS, ADJECTIVES AND ADVERBS
#######################################################################
###### Numerals
SFX E Y 7
SFX E 0 ەم . 
SFX E 0 ەمین . 
SFX E 0 هەم . 
SFX E 0 هەمین
SFX E 0 ەمین
SFX E 0 یەم [ایێە]
SFX E 0 یەمین [ایێە]


###### Particles
SFX G Y 26
SFX G 0 انە [^ێاە]
SFX G 0 دا .
SFX G 0 وە [اە]
SFX G 0 ەوە [^اە]
SFX G 0 م .
SFX G 0 ت .
SFX G 0 ی .
SFX G 0 مان .
SFX G 0 تان .
SFX G 0 یان .
SFX G 0 یش [^ێاە]
SFX G 0 یشەوە [^ێاە]
SFX G 0 یشم [^ێاە]
SFX G 0 یشت [^ێاە]
SFX G 0 یشی [^ێاە]
SFX G 0 یشمان [^ێاە]
SFX G 0 یشتان [^ێاە]
SFX G 0 یشیان [^ێاە]
SFX G 0 ش [ێاە]
SFX G 0 شەوە [ێاە]
SFX G 0 شت [ێاە]
SFX G 0 شی [ێاە]
SFX G 0 شمان [ێاە]
SFX G 0 شتان [ێاە]
SFX G 0 شیان [ێاە]
SFX G 0 شم [ێاە]


####### Pronouns
SFX B Y 21
SFX B 0 یش .
SFX B 0 م .
SFX B 0 ت .
SFX B 0 ی .
SFX B 0 مان .
SFX B 0 تان .
SFX B 0 یان .
SFX B 0 ەوە .
SFX B 0 دا .
SFX B 0 ڕا .
SFX B 0 ش [ۆەا]
SFX B 0 شم [ۆاە]
SFX B 0 شت [ۆاە]
SFX B 0 شی [ۆاە]
SFX B 0 شمان [ۆاە]
SFX B 0 شتان [ۆاە]
SFX B 0 شیان [ۆاە]
SFX B 0 وە [ۆاە]
SFX B 0 وەش [ۆاە]
SFX B 0 ەوە [ۆاە]
SFX B 0 ەوەش [ۆاە]


# END OF AFF FILE
# =======================================================================================
# Copyright 2020-2025 Sina Ahmadi <ahmadi.sina@outlook.com> <sinaahmadi.github.io/>
# =======================================================================================
